Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4119
Exculpatory evidence, defined.

For purposes of the DNA Testing Act, exculpatory evidence means evidence which is favorable to the person in custody and material to the issue of the guilt of the person in custody.

Laws 2001, LB 659, § 4.

DNA testing results that excluded a prisoner as a source of semen found on the victim at the time of her death did not fit within the definition of exculpatory evidence, because the prisoner was not charged with sexual assault, and his exclusion as a source of semen was not material to whether he was guilty of murder or of using a weapon to commit a felony. State v. Buckman, 311 Neb. 304, 971 N.W.2d 791 (2022).